District of Columbia, session 26, B26-0404.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE COUNCIL OF THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA, That this
act may be cited as the “Safe Pregnancy, Delivery, and Postpartum Care for Youth at DYRS
Amendment Act of 2026”.
Sec. 2. Subtitle A of Title I of the Department of Youth Rehabilitation Services
Establishment Act of 2004, effective April 12, 2005 (D.C. Law 15-335; D.C. Official Code § 2-
1515.01 et seq.), is amended by adding a new section 105b to read as follows:
“Sec. 105b. Safe and supported pregnancy and delivery for detained youth.
“(a) Upon admission to a facility under its control and additionally when required as a
baseline assessment for prescription of a recommended medication by a physician, the
Department shall make a pregnancy test available to all youth who may become pregnant.
“(b) Upon confirmation of a detained youth’s pregnancy, the Department shall advise the
youth orally or in writing of the standards and policies governing pregnant youth in the
Department’s care.
“(c) The Department shall ensure that pregnant youth in its care receive confidential,
appropriate, timely, culturally responsive, and comprehensive healthcare, evaluation, and
treatment from maternal healthcare providers licensed in the District, including:
“(1) Healthcare for conditions that emerge during pregnancy or postpartum,
including contact with a maternal care provider within the first 3 weeks postpartum, followed by
ongoing care as needed, and concluding with a comprehensive postpartum visit no later than 12
weeks after birth;
“(2) Specialized pregnancy or postpartum healthcare, if necessary, which may be
referred to external healthcare providers, in accordance with Title II of the Limitations on the
Use of Restraints Amendment Act of 2014, effective July 25, 2015 (D.C. Law 20-280; D.C.
Official Code 24-276.01 et seq.);
1

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
“(3) Counseling regarding:
“(A) Family planning;
“(B) Prenatal counseling and education;
“(C) Birth control;
“(D) Test results; and
“(E) Perinatal mental health conditions.
“(4) Medical, healthcare, and personal care supplies prescribed or recommended
by a licensed healthcare provider treating a pregnant youth or reasonably requested by a pregnant
youth, which shall be provided at no cost to the pregnant youth, including:
“(A) Equipment and cleaning supplies necessary to safely pump, store,
and transport breast milk, including nursing brassieres, breast pumps, breast milk storage bags,
detergent, bottle brushes, drying racks, a refrigerator of sufficient capacity, and a cooler; and
“(B) The diet that is required by Department policy or is medically
recommended during pregnancy and postpartum.”.
Sec. 3. Fiscal impact statement.
The Council adopts the fiscal impact statement in the committee report as the fiscal
impact statement required by section 4a of the General Legislative Procedures Act of 1975,
approved October 16, 2006 (120 Stat. 2038; D.C. Official Code § 1-301.47a).
Sec. 4. Effective date.
This act shall take effect after approval by the Mayor (or in the event of veto by the
Mayor, action by the Council to override the veto) and a 30-day period of congressional review
2

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
as provided in section 602(c)(1) of the District of Columbia Home Rule Act, approved December
24, 1973 (87 Stat. 813; D.C. Official Code § 1-206.02(c)(1)).
___________________________________
Chairman
Council of the District of Columbia
_________________________________
Mayor
District of Columbia
3